Wisconsin, session 2025, AB48.
do enact as follows:AB48,11Section 1. 20.255 (1) (jg) of the statutes is amended to read:AB48,3,5120.255 (1) (jg) School lunch handling charges. The amounts in the schedule 2for the transportation, warehousing, processing, and insuring of food products 3granted to this state by the federal government. All moneys received from contracts 4made under s. 115.34 (1) (1r), under which food products granted to the state by the 5federal government are utilized, shall be credited to this appropriation.AB48,26Section 2. 20.255 (2) (cL) of the statutes is created to read:AB48,3,8720.255 (2) (cL) Reimbursement for school lunch programs. A sum sufficient 8for reimbursement for school lunch programs under s. 115.34 (2) and (5) (a) 1.AB48,39Section 3. 20.255 (2) (cm) of the statutes is amended to read:AB48,3,131020.255 (2) (cm) Reimbursement for school breakfast programs. As a 11continuing appropriation, the amounts in the schedule A sum sufficient for 12reimbursement for school breakfast programs under s. 115.341 115.34 (3) and (5) 13(a) 2.AB48,414Section 4. 20.255 (2) (cn) of the statutes is amended to read:AB48,3,171520.255 (2) (cn) Aids for school lunches and nutritional improvement for the 16elderly. The amounts in the schedule for the payment of school lunch aids under s. 17115.34 (2) and for nutritional improvement under ss. 36.51, 38.36, and 115.345.AB48,518Section 5. 115.34 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB48,3,1919115.34 (title) School lunch program and breakfast programs.AB48,620Section 6. 115.34 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 115.34 (1r).AB48,721Section 7. 115.34 (1g) of the statutes is created to read:AB48,3,2222115.34 (1g) In this section:AB48,4,21(a) “Eligible school” means a school that is eligible for reimbursement for a 2school year under sub. (4).AB48,4,83(b) “Governing body” means the school board of a school district, operator of a 4charter school under s. 118.40 (2r) or (2x), governing body of a private school, 5governing body of a tribal school, operator of a residential care center for children 6and youth, as defined in s. 115.76 (14g), director of the Wisconsin Educational 7Services Program for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing, or director of the Wisconsin 8Center for the Blind and Visually Impaired.AB48,4,139(c) “School” means a public school, including a charter school under s. 118.40 10(2r) or (2x), private school, tribal school, residential care center for children and 11youth, as defined in s. 115.76 (14g), the Wisconsin Educational Services Program 12for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing, or the Wisconsin Center for the Blind and 13Visually Impaired.AB48,814Section 8. 115.34 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB48,5,515115.34 (2) The Beginning with reimbursements paid in 2026-27 for school 16lunches served in the 2025-26 school year, from the appropriation under s. 20.255 17(2) (cL), the state superintendent shall make payments to school districts, private 18schools, charter schools under s. 118.40 (2r) and (2x), tribal schools, the program 19under s. 115.52, and the center under s. 115.525 a payment to the governing body of 20a school that is not an eligible school for a school year and that participates in the 21national school lunch program, 42 USC 1751 to 1769j, for that school year for school 22lunches served to children in the prior that school year as determined by the state 23superintendent from the appropriation under s. 20.255 (2) (cn). Payments shall 1equal the state’s matching obligation under 42 USC 1751 et seq to 1769j. Payments 2in the current year shall be determined by prorating the state’s matching obligation 3based on the number of school lunches served to children in the prior year. In this 4subsection, “private school” means any school defined in s. 115.001 (3r) which 5complies with the requirements of 42 USC 2000d.AB48,96Section 9. 115.34 (3) to (5) of the statutes are created to read:AB48,5,127115.34 (3) Beginning with reimbursements paid in 2026-27 for breakfasts 8served in the 2025-26 school year, from the appropriation under s. 20.255 (2) (cm), 9the state superintendent shall reimburse the governing body of a school that is not 10an eligible school for a school year and that participates in the federal school 11breakfast program, 42 USC 1773, for that school year 15 cents for each breakfast 12served in that school year at the school that meets the requirements of 7 CFR 220.8.AB48,5,1613(4) Beginning with reimbursements for school lunches and breakfasts served 14in the 2025-26 school year, the governing body of a school is eligible for 15reimbursement under sub. (5) for meals served in the school year only if the 16governing body does all of the following:AB48,5,1817(a) Participates in both the national school lunch program, 42 USC 1751 to 181769j, and the federal school breakfast program, 42 USC 1773, for the school year.AB48,5,2219(b) For each day in which school is in session during the school year, provides 20to any pupil who requests, at no cost to the pupil, one lunch that meets the 21requirements under 7 CFR 210.10 and one breakfast that meets the requirements 22of 7 CFR 220.8.AB48,6,223(5) (a) Beginning with reimbursements for school lunches and breakfasts 1served in the 2025-26 school year, subject to par. (b), the state superintendent shall 2reimburse the governing body of an eligible school all of the following amounts:AB48,6,731. From the appropriation under s. 20.255 (2) (cL), for each lunch the eligible 4school served under sub. (4) (b) in the prior school year, an amount equal to the 5federal reimbursement rate under the national school lunch program, 42 USC 1751 6to 1769j, applicable to the eligible school for serving a lunch to a pupil who satisfies 7the income eligibility criteria for a free lunch under 42 USC 1758 (b) (1).AB48,6,1382. From the appropriation under s. 20.255 (2) (cm), for each breakfast the 9eligible school served under sub. (4) (b) in the prior school year, an amount equal to 10the federal reimbursement rate under the federal school breakfast program, 42 11USC 1773, applicable to the eligible school for serving a breakfast to a pupil who 12satisfies the income eligibility criteria for a free breakfast under 42 USC 1773 (e) (1) 13(A).AB48,6,1714(b) The state superintendent shall reduce the reimbursement amount the 15state superintendent pays to the governing body of an eligible school under par. (a) 16by any amount the governing body receives from the federal government as 17reimbursement for the same meals.AB48,6,2118(c) The governing body of an eligible school may charge a pupil for food or 19drink items the eligible school serves to the pupil that are in addition to or different 20from the meals the eligible school is required to serve to the pupil at no cost under 21sub. (4) (b).AB48,1022Section 10. 115.341 of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act .... 23(this act), is repealed.AB48,111Section 11. 115.341 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB48,7,82115.341 (1) From the appropriation under s. 20.255 (2) (cm), the state 3superintendent shall reimburse each school board 15 cents for each breakfast 4served at a school that meets the requirements of 7 CFR 220.8 and shall reimburse 5each governing body of a private school or tribal school 15 cents for each breakfast 6served at the private school or tribal school that meets the requirements of 7 CFR 7220.8. This subsection does not apply to reimbursements paid in 2026-27 for 8breakfasts served in the 2025-26 school year or in any school year thereafter.AB48,129Section 12. Nonstatutory provisions.AB48,7,1310(1) Legislative purpose and intent. It is the intent of the legislature that 11no child in this state should experience hunger and that every school-age child 12should benefit from access to at least 2 healthy, nutritious meals during the school 13day.AB48,7,1914(2) Transitional provision; reimbursement for school lunches served 15in 2024-25. Notwithstanding s. 115.34 (2), the state superintendent of public 16instruction shall make payments to school districts, private schools, charter schools 17under s. 118.40 (2r) and (2x), tribal schools, the program under s. 115.52, and the 18center under s. 115.525 for school lunches served to children in the 2024-25 school 19year as provided under s. 115.34 (2), 2023 stats.AB48,1320Section 13. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 21publication, except as follows:AB48,7,2322(1) The treatment of s. 20.255 (2) (cL), (cm), and (cn) and the repeal of s. 23115.341 take effect on July 1, 2026.AB48,7,2424